Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1209] Authority to withhold salary.
The administrator of the state procurement office and the director of finance
of each county shall ascertain if inventories have been filed as required by
sections 103D-1206 and 103D-1208 respectively. If any officer, head of
department, agent, employee, or other person fails to file the required
inventory within the time prescribed, the administrator of the state
procurement office or director shall withhold the salary or wage due the
officer, head of department, agent, employee, or other person until the
inventory is filed; provided that at the discretion of administrator of the
state procurement office or director the delay in filing the required inventory
return within the time prescribed was for good cause. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next